Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202532-620
President and Vice President; candidates; certification; new political party; how treated; requirements; nonpartisan status; filing; application; contents; decline ballot placement; when.

(1) Partisan candidates for the offices of President and Vice President of the United States on the general election ballot shall be certified to the Governor and Secretary of State by the national nominating convention as provided by law.

(2) Candidates for the offices of President and Vice President of the United States of newly established political parties may obtain general election ballot position by filing with the Secretary of State an application containing:

(a) The name or names to be printed on the ballot;

(b) The name of the political party;

(c) The written consent of the designated vice-presidential candidate to have his or her name printed on the ballot; and

(d) The names and addresses of the persons who will represent the applicant as presidential elector candidates together with the written consent of such persons to become candidates.

(3) Candidates for the offices of President and Vice President of the United States of nonpartisan status may obtain general election ballot position by filing with the Secretary of State:

(a) An application containing:

(i) The name or names to be printed on the ballot;

(ii) The status of the candidacy as nonpartisan;

(iii) The written consent of the designated vice-presidential candidate to have his or her name printed on the ballot; and

(iv) The names and addresses of the persons who will represent the applicant as presidential elector candidates together with the written consent of such persons to become candidates; and

(b) A petition signed by not less than two thousand five hundred registered voters. Such petitions shall conform to the requirements of sections 32-620.01 and 32-628 and shall be filed with the Secretary of State by August 1 in the year of the presidential general election.

(4) If a presidential candidate who obtained ballot placement pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) of this section files an affidavit with the Secretary of State stating that the candidate declines ballot placement at least sixty days before the general election, the name shall not be printed on the general election ballot.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 188;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 64;

Laws 2013, LB349, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 45.

This statute is unconstitutional as relates to requirements for independent candidates for President and Vice President of United States. MacBride v. Exon, 558 F.2d 443 (8th Cir. 1977).

Although Nebraska's statutes unconstitutionally deny an independent candidate access to appear on the ballot in presidential elections, the court directed the independent be included upon a determination he was a serious candidate, truly independent, with a satisfactory level of community support. McCarthy v. Exon, 424 F.Supp. 1143 (D. Neb. 1976).